Arkansas, session 2025, HB1865.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 5, Chapter 4, Subchapter 7, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
5-4-708. Enhanced penalty for offenses committed against child.
(a) A person who is eighteen (18) years of age or older and commits a
felony offense described in subsection (b) of this section is subject to an
enhanced penalty under this section if:
(1) The offense is committed against a child; and
(2) The person is in a position of trust or authority over the
child.
(b) The enhanced penalty in this section applies to a felony offense
listed below or contained in the following chapters or subchapters:
(1) Homicide, § 5-10-101 et seq.;
(2) Kidnapping and related offenses, § 5-11-101 et seq.;
(3) Sexual offenses, § 5-14-101 et seq.;
(4) Voyeurism offenses, § 5-16-101 et seq.;
(5) The Human Trafficking Act of 2013, § 5-18-101 et seq.;
(6) The Arkansas Protection of Children Against Exploitation Act
*CEB225*
04-14-2025 12:08:31 CEB225

As Engrossed: S4/8/25 S4/14/25 HB1865
of 1979, § 5-27-301 et seq.;
(7) Use of children in sexual performances, § 5-27-401 et seq.;
and
(8) Computer crimes against minors, § 5-27-601 et seq.
(c) The minimum term of imprisonment under an enhanced penalty under
this section is:
(1) Thirty (30) years for a Class Y felony;
(2) Fifteen (15) years for a Class A felony;
(3) Ten (10) years for a Class B felony;
(4) Five (5) years for a Class C felony; and
(5) One (1) year for a Class D felony.
(d) If an enhanced penalty is sought under this section, the
information or indictment shall include:
(1) That the enhanced penalty under this section is being
sought; and
(2) The allegations supporting the imposition of the enhanced
penalty under this section.

/s/Vaught

















04-14-2025 12:08:31 CEB225